Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 SF 2284 (3) 91 th/ns/mb S.F. 2284 Section 1. Section 321P.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. a. A person shall not provide an image 3 of a registration plate or any other accompanying data to a 4 third party unless the third party is one of the following: 5 (1) A peace officer or law enforcement agency. 6 (2) A person who is under contract with a law enforcement 7 agency solely to protect public safety, conduct criminal 8 investigations, or ensure compliance with federal, state, or 9 local law. 10 (3) The national insurance crime bureau or its successor 11 organization, an insurance carrier, or an insurance support 12 organization if the information is provided solely to 13 investigate insurance fraud, recover a vehicle, or adjudicate 14 an insurance claim. 15 b. Paragraph âaâ shall not be construed to authorize 16 a nongovernmental third party to provide an image of a 17 registration plate or any other accompanying data to another 18 nongovernmental third party. 19 Sec. 2. Section 321P.4, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 4. A person who violates subsection 1 or 2A commits a simple 22 misdemeanor. 23 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 321P.4A Automated vehicle noise 24 enforcement systems. 25 1. A local authority shall not issue a citation for a 26 violation detected by an automated vehicle noise enforcement 27 system based on noise emitted from the use of a vehicleâs brake 28 or exhaust system while the vehicle is reducing speed. 29 2. A citation issued in violation of subsection 1 is void 30 and unenforceable. 31 3. For purposes of this section, âautomated vehicle noise 32 enforcement systemâ means a camera or other optical device 33 designed to work in conjunction with a noise measuring device 34 to detect and automatically capture or store an image or any 35 -1- SF 2284 (3) 91 th/ns/mb 1/ 3 S.F. 2284 accompanying data of a vehicle emitting noise that exceeds a 1 specified noise level restriction. 2 Sec. 4. Section 321P.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 a. Notwithstanding subsection 1 , a local authority shall 5 provide the owner of a motor vehicle who receives a citation 6 for a violation detected by a system with an opportunity 7 to submit evidence that the owner was not operating the 8 motor vehicle at the time of the violation. As part of the 9 proceeding, the owner shall may provide the name and address 10 of the person who was operating the motor vehicle at the time 11 of the violation. A citation issued to an owner who submits 12 evidence sufficient to prove that the owner was not operating 13 the motor vehicle at the time of the violation shall be 14 dismissed and the owner shall not be required to pay a fee if 15 the citation is not amended pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 16 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 321P.7A Liability for violations other 17 than speed violations. 18 1. A local authority that issues a citation for a violation 19 other than for excessive speed that was detected using a 20 camera or other optical device designed to work in conjunction 21 with another device to detect a violation of section 22 321.256, 321.257, 321.436, or any other traffic law, and to 23 automatically capture or store an image or any accompanying 24 data of a motor vehicle violating the traffic law, shall 25 provide the owner of the motor vehicle who received a citation 26 with an opportunity to submit evidence that the owner was not 27 operating the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. 28 2. As part of the proceeding, the owner may provide the 29 name and address of the person who was operating the motor 30 vehicle at the time of the violation. Notwithstanding section 31 321.133, a citation issued to an owner who submits evidence 32 sufficient to prove that the owner was not operating the motor 33 vehicle at the time of the violation shall be dismissed and the 34 owner shall not be required to pay a fee if the citation is not 35 -2- SF 2284 (3) 91 th/ns/mb 2/ 3 S.F. 2284 amended pursuant to subsection 3. 1 3. A citation issued to the owner of a motor vehicle may be 2 amended and issued to the person identified under subsection 2 3 who was operating the motor vehicle. 4 -3- SF 2284 (3) 91 th/ns/mb 3/ 3